Maryland, session 2026, SB0883.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 10–601(p) through (hhh) of Article – Economic Development of the
Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 10–601(r) through (jjj),
respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Economic Development
10–601.
(P) “CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY” MEANS A SOCCER
STADIUM AND FACILITY LOCATED IN BALTIMORE CITY THAT IS USED PRIMARILY
FOR PROFESSIONAL SOCCER AND AS A SOCCER ACADEMY AND SCHOOL.
(Q) “CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY FUND” MEANS THE
CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER §
10–657.7 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(u) “Facility” means:
(1) a structure or other improvement developed at Camden Yards;
(2) a convention facility;
(3) the Hippodrome Performing Arts facility;
(4) a sports facility;
(5) a Baltimore City public school facility;
(6) a racing facility;
(7) a training facility for thoroughbred horses;
(8) a public school facility;
(9) the Hagerstown Multi–Use Sports and Events Facility;

SENATE BILL 883
(10) a sports entertainment facility; [or]
(11) a Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor facility; OR
(12) THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY.
10–613.
(b) The Authority may review and make recommendations on proposed
convention center facilities, the Hippodrome Performing Arts facility, the Hagerstown
Multi–Use Sports and Events Facility, [and] a Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor
facility, AND THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY, including the
expansion and enhancement of the Baltimore City Convention Center and the Ocean City
Convention Center and the development and construction of the Montgomery County
Conference Center, the Hippodrome Performing Arts Center, the Hagerstown Multi–Use
Sports and Events Facility, [and] a Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor facility,
AND THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY with respect to location,
purpose, design, function, capacity, parking, costs, funding mechanisms, and revenue
alternatives, with specific recommendations on:
(1) the level of support from the private sector;
(2) the type of support from the private sector;
(3) special taxing sources;
(4) projected revenues;
(5) bonding authority and the source of debt service; and
(6) the fiscal impact on the State of any revenue alternatives.
10–618.
(b) The Authority may:
(1) acquire by any of the means specified in § 10–620(a) of this subtitle:
(i) a site at Camden Yards for a facility;
(ii) a Baltimore Convention site or an interest in the site;
(iii) an Ocean City Convention site or an interest in the site;
(iv) a Montgomery County Conference site or an interest in the site;

SENATE BILL 883 5
(v) a Hippodrome Performing Arts site or an interest in the site;
(vi) a Hagerstown Multi–Use Sports and Events Facility site or an
interest in the site;
(vii) a sports entertainment facility site or an interest in the site;
[and]
(viii) a Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor facility site or an
interest in the site; and
(IX) THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY SITE
OR AN INTEREST IN THE SITE; AND
(2) construct or enter into a contract to construct a facility on a site it
acquires under this subsection.
10–620.
(d) (1) The exercise of authority under this subsection is subject to the prior
approval of the Board of Public Works.
(2) On request of the Authority, the State, a unit of the State, or a political
subdivision may lease, lend, grant, or otherwise convey to the Authority, property,
including property devoted to public use, as necessary or convenient for the purposes of this
subtitle.
(3) The State may lease or sublease a facility, or an interest in a facility,
from or to the Authority, whether or not constructed or usable.
(4) Lease payments to the Authority appropriated by the State shall be
transferred to:
(i) the Baltimore Convention Fund if appropriated for a Baltimore
Convention facility;
(ii) the Camden Yards Fund if appropriated for a sports facility or
other facility at Camden Yards;
(iii) the Hippodrome Performing Arts Fund if appropriated for a
Hippodrome Performing Arts facility;
(iv) the Montgomery County Conference Fund if appropriated for a
Montgomery County Conference facility;

SENATE BILL 883
(v) the Ocean City Convention Fund if appropriated for an Ocean
City Convention facility;
(vi) the Hagerstown Multi–Use Sports and Events Facility Fund if
appropriated for a Hagerstown Multi–Use Sports and Events Facility;
(vii) the Sports Entertainment Facilities Financing Fund if
appropriated for a sports entertainment facility; [or]
(viii) the Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor Facility Fund if
appropriated for a Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor facility; OR
(IX) THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY
FUND IF APPROPRIATED FOR THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND
FACILITY.
(e) (1) This subsection does not apply to the Camden Yards site, Baltimore
Convention site, Ocean City Convention site, Hippodrome Performing Arts site, any
Baltimore City public school site, any racing facility, the Hagerstown Multi–Use Sports and
Events Facility site, any supplemental facility site, any public school site, a sports
entertainment facility, [or] a Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor facility site, OR
THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY SITE.
(2) The Authority and any Authority affiliate are subject to applicable
planning, zoning, and development regulations to the same extent as a private commercial
or industrial enterprise.
10–625.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Authority shall submit:
(2) annual reports on the additional tax revenues generated by each of the
following facilities:
(i) the Baltimore Convention facility;
(ii) the Hippodrome Performing Arts facility;
(iii) the Montgomery County Conference facility;
(iv) the Ocean City Convention facility;
(v) the Hagerstown Multi–Use Sports and Events Facility;
(vi) a sports entertainment facility; [and]

SENATE BILL 883 7
(vii) a Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor facility site; AND
(VIII) THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY.
10–628.
(c) (1) Unless authorized by the General Assembly, the Board of Public Works
may not approve an issuance by the Authority of bonds, whether taxable or tax exempt,
that constitute tax supported debt or nontax supported debt if, after issuance, there would
be outstanding and unpaid more than the following face amounts of the bonds for the
purpose of financing acquisition, construction, renovation, and related expenses for
construction management, professional fees, and contingencies in connection with:
(i) the Baltimore Convention facility – $55,000,000;
(ii) the Hippodrome Performing Arts facility – $20,250,000;
(iii) the Montgomery County Conference facility – $23,185,000;
(iv) the Ocean City Convention facility – $24,500,000;
(v) Baltimore City public school facilities – $1,100,000,000;
(vi) supplemental facilities – $25,000,000;
(vii) racing facilities – $400,000,000;
(viii) public school facilities in the State – $2,200,000,000;
(ix) the Hagerstown Multi–Use Sports and Events Facility –
$59,500,000;
(x) sports entertainment facilities – $220,000,000; [and]
(xi) Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor facilities –
$400,000,000; AND
(XII) THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY –
$216,600,000.
10–634.
(a) A pledge by the Authority of revenues or money deposited in the Baltimore
City Public School Construction Financing Fund [or], the Supplemental Public School
Construction Financing Fund, OR THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND

SENATE BILL 883
FACILITY FUND as security for an issue of bonds is valid and binding from when the pledge
is made.
(b) (1) The revenues or money deposited in the Baltimore City Public School
Construction Financing Fund [or], the Supplemental Public School Construction Financing
Fund, OR THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY FUND that are
pledged are immediately subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery or
further act.
(2) The lien of any pledge is valid and binding against any person having a
claim against the Authority in tort, contract, or otherwise, regardless of whether the person
has notice of the lien.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in order to perfect a lien on
pledged revenues or money deposited in the Baltimore City Public School Construction
Financing Fund [or], the Supplemental Public School Construction Financing Fund, OR
THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY FUND against a third person,
it is not necessary to file or record any document adopted or entered into by the Authority
in any public record other than in the records of the Authority.
10–646.5.
(A) EXCEPT AS AUTHORIZED BY § 10–639 OF THIS SUBTITLE, TO FINANCE
SITE ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF ANY SEGMENT OF THE
CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY, THE AUTHORITY SHALL COMPLY
WITH THIS SECTION.
(B) AT LEAST 45 DAYS BEFORE SEEKING APPROVAL OF THE BOARD OF
PUBLIC WORKS FOR EACH BOND ISSUE OR OTHER BORROWING, THE AUTHORITY
SHALL PROVIDE TO THE FISCAL COMMITTEES OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A
COMPREHENSIVE FINANCING PLAN FOR THE RELEVANT SEGMENT OF THE FACILITY.
(C) THE AUTHORITY SHALL OBTAIN THE APPROVAL OF THE BOARD OF
PUBLIC WORKS OF THE PROPOSED BOND ISSUE AND THE FINANCING PLAN.
(D) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, UNTIL
THE BONDS THAT HAVE BEEN ISSUED TO FINANCE THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER
STADIUM AND FACILITY ARE NO LONGER OUTSTANDING AND UNPAID, THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL DEPOSIT INTO THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND
FACILITY FUND THE AMOUNT NECESSARY TO PAY PRINCIPAL AND INTEREST ON THE
BONDS FOR THAT FISCAL YEAR AS REQUIRED UNDER § 9–1E–12(B)(2)(III) OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 883 9
(E) THE AUTHORITY MAY NOT ISSUE BONDS TO FINANCE THE CARROLL
PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY UNTIL THE AUTHORITY AND UNITED
PARTNERSHIP SECURE A WRITTEN OPERATING AGREEMENT.
10–657.7.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER
STADIUM AND FACILITY FUND.
(B) THERE IS A CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO ENABLE THE AUTHORITY TO:
(1) USE THE FUND AS A REVOLVING FUND FOR IMPLEMENTING THIS
SUBTITLE AS IT RELATES TO THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY;
AND
(2) PAY ANY EXPENSES INCURRED BY THE AUTHORITY THAT ARE
RELATED TO THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY.
(D) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A CONTINUING, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO REVERSION UNDER § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) (1) TO THE EXTENT CONSIDERED APPROPRIATE BY THE AUTHORITY,
THE RECEIPTS OF THE FUND SHALL BE PLEDGED TO AND CHARGED WITH THE
FOLLOWING RELATING TO THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY:
(I) PAYMENT OF DEBT SERVICE ON AUTHORITY BONDS;
(II) ALL REASONABLE CHARGES AND EXPENSES RELATED TO
THE AUTHORITY’S BORROWING; AND
(III) THE MANAGEMENT OF AUTHORITY OBLIGATIONS.
(2) THE PLEDGE SHALL BE EFFECTIVE AS PROVIDED IN § 10–634 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(G) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:

SENATE BILL 883
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED FOR DEPOSIT IN THE FUND;
(2) REVENUES COLLECTED OR RECEIVED FROM ANY SOURCE UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE CONCERNING THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND
FACILITY;
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(4) ANY ADDITIONAL MONEY MADE AVAILABLE FROM ANY PUBLIC OR
PRIVATE SOURCE FOR THE PURPOSES ESTABLISHED FOR THE FUND.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE PAID INTO THE
FUND.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND
FACILITY FUND.
Article – State Government
9–1E–12.

SENATE BILL 883 11
(a) (1) The Commission shall account to the Comptroller for all of the revenue
under this subtitle.
(2) The proceeds from sports wagering, less the amount retained by the
licensee under subsection (b)(1) of this section, shall be under the control of the Comptroller
and distributed as provided under subsection (b) of this section.
(b) (1) (i) Except as provided in subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this
paragraph, all proceeds from sports wagering shall be electronically transferred monthly
into the State Lottery Fund established under Subtitle 1 of this title.
(ii) A Class A–1 and A–2 sports wagering facility licensee shall
retain 85% of the proceeds from sports wagering conducted at the locations described in §
9–1E–09(a) of this subtitle.
(iii) A Class B–1 and B–2 sports wagering facility licensee shall
retain 85% of the proceeds from sports wagering conducted at the location described in the
licensee’s application.
(iv) A mobile sports wagering licensee shall retain 80% of the
proceeds from online sports wagering received by the licensee.
(2) (i) Except as provided in [subparagraph (ii)] SUBPARAGRAPHS (II)
AND (III) of this paragraph, all proceeds from sports wagering in the State Lottery Fund
established under Subtitle 1 of this title shall be distributed on a monthly basis, on a
properly approved transmittal prepared by the Commission to the Blueprint for Maryland’s
Future Fund established under § 5–206 of the Education Article.
(ii) For fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, 5% of the
proceeds attributable to mobile sports wagering shall be deposited in the General Fund.
(III) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, BEFORE MAKING THE DISTRIBUTIONS REQUIRED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPHS (I) AND (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL
DISTRIBUTE TO THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10–657.7 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE THE
AMOUNT NECESSARY TO PAY THE PRINCIPAL OF AND INTEREST ON THE BONDS
ISSUED FOR THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY FOR THAT
FISCAL YEAR.
Chapter 717 of the Acts of 2024, as amended by Chapters 237, 409, and 410 of the
Acts of 2025
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, and unless inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other

SENATE BILL 883
federal requirement, or with the terms of a gift or settlement agreement, for fiscal years
2024 through 2028, net interest on all State money allocated by the State Treasurer under
§ 6–226 of the State Finance and Procurement Article to special funds or accounts, and
otherwise entitled to receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall
accrue to the General Fund of the State, with the exception of the following funds:
(87) the Academic Excellence Fund; [and]
(88) the Abandoned and Neglected Cemeteries Fund; AND
(89) THE CARROLL PARK SOCCER STADIUM AND FACILITY FUND.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.